Washington statutes.
RCW 35.63.090

Restrictions—Purposes of.

All regulations shall be worked out as parts of a comprehensive plan which each commission shall prepare for the physical and other generally advantageous development of the municipality and shall be designed, among other things, to encourage the most appropriate use of land throughout the municipality; to lessen traffic congestion and accidents; to secure safety from fire; to provide adequate light and air; to prevent overcrowding of land; to avoid undue concentration of population; to promote a coordinated development of the unbuilt areas; to encourage the formation of neighborhood or community units; to secure an appropriate allotment of land area in new developments for all the requirements of community life; to conserve and restore natural beauty and other natural resources; to encourage and protect access to direct sunlight for solar energy systems; and to facilitate the adequate provision of transportation, water, sewerage and other public uses and requirements, including protection of the quality and quantity of groundwater used for public water supplies. Each plan shall include a review of drainage, flooding, and stormwater runoff in the area and nearby jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or cleanse those discharges that pollute Puget Sound or waters entering Puget Sound.

[ 1985 c 126 s 1; 1984 c 253 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 170 s 5; 1965 c 7 s 35.63.090. Prior: 1935 c 44 s 7; RRS s 9322-7.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 170: See note following RCW 64.04.140.